Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.031

Sending notices, orders, payments to claimants.

On all claims under this chapter, claimants' written or electronic notices, orders, or payments must be forwarded directly to the claimant until such time as there has been entered an order on the claim appealable to the board of industrial insurance appeals. Claimants' written or electronic notices, orders, or payments may be forwarded to the claimant in care of a representative before an order has been entered if the claimant sets forth in writing the name and address of the representative to whom the claimant desires this information to be forwarded.

[ 2017 c 235 s 3; 2013 c 125 s 1; 2011 c 346 s 201.]

NOTES:

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.